Missouri, session 2026, SB1363.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 285, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 285.075, to read as
follows:
285.075. 1. Notwithstanding any voluntary agreement
entered into between the United States Department of Labor
and a franchisee or a franchisor, neither a franchisee nor a
franchisee's employee shall be deemed to be an employee of
the franchisor for any purpose, unless the franchisor
exercises direct and immediate control over the hiring,
termination, discipline, and direction of the franchisee's
employees.
2. For purposes of this section, the terms
"franchisee" and "franchisor" shall have the same meaning as
in 16 CFR 436.1.
✓